Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-216.
Further limitations on manufacturers, bottlers, importers, brokers or wholesalers; ownership interests prohibited; exceptions; prohibited trade practices.

As used in this section:“Broker” means any person, other than a manufacturer or a licensed beer or wine importer, who regularly engages in the business of bringing together sellers and purchasers of alcoholic beverages for resale and arranges for or consummates such transactions with persons in the Commonwealth to whom such alcoholic beverages may lawfully be sold and shipped into the Commonwealth pursuant to the provisions of this subtitle.“Manufacturer, bottler, importer, broker or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages” includes any officers or directors of any such manufacturer, bottler, importer, broker or wholesaler.

Except as provided in this subtitle, no manufacturer, importer, bottler, broker or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not, shall acquire or hold any financial interest, direct or indirect, (i) in the business for which any retail license is issued or (ii) in the premises where the business of a retail licensee is conducted.

Subdivision B (ii) shall not apply so long as such manufacturer, bottler, importer, broker or wholesaler does not sell or otherwise furnish, directly or indirectly, alcoholic beverages or other merchandise to such retail licensee and such retailer is not required by agreement or otherwise to exclude from sale at his establishment alcoholic beverages of other manufacturers, bottlers, importers, brokers or wholesalers.

Service as a member of the board of directors of a corporation licensed as a retailer, the shares of stock of which are sold to the general public on any national or local stock exchange, shall not be deemed to be a financial interest, direct or indirect, in the business or the premises of the retail licensee.

A brewery, winery or subsidiary or affiliate thereof, hereinafter collectively referred to as a financing corporation, may participate in financing the business of a wholesale licensee in the Commonwealth by providing debt or equity capital or both but only if done in accordance with the provisions of this subsection.

In order to assist a proposed new owner of an existing wholesale licensee, a financing corporation may provide debt or equity capital, or both, if prior approval of the Board has been obtained pursuant to subdivision 3 b of subsection B. A financing corporation which proposes to provide equity capital shall cause the proposed new owner to form a Virginia limited partnership in which the new owner is the general partner and the financing corporation is a limited partner. If the general partner defaults on any financial obligation to the limited partner, which default has been specifically defined in the partnership agreement, or, if the new owner defaults on its obligation to pay principal and interest when due to the financing corporation as specifically defined in the loan documents, then, and only then, shall such financing corporation be allowed to take title to the business of the wholesale licensee. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and provided written notice has been given to the Board within two business days after taking title, the wholesale licensee may be managed and operated by such financing corporation pursuant to the existing wholesale license for a period of time not to exceed 180 days as if the license had been issued in the name of the financing corporation. On or before the expiration of such 180-day period, the financing corporation shall cause ownership of the wholesale licensee’s business to be transferred to a new owner. Otherwise, on the 181st day, the license shall be deemed terminated. The financing corporation may not participate in financing the transfer of ownership to the new owner or to any other subsequent owner for a period of twenty years following the effective date of the original financing transaction; except where a transfer takes place before the expiration of the eighth full year following the effective date of the original financing transaction in which case the financing corporation may finance such transfer as long as the new owner is required to return such debt or equity capital within the originally prescribed eight-year period. The financing corporation may exercise its right to take title to, manage and operate the business of, the wholesale licensee only once during such eight-year period.

In any case in which a financing corporation proposes to provide debt or equity capital in order to assist in a change of ownership of an existing wholesale licensee, the parties to the transaction shall first submit an application for a wholesale license in the name of the proposed new owner to the Board.The Board shall be provided with all documents that pertain to the transaction at the time of the license application and shall ensure that the application complies with all requirements of law pertaining to the issuance of wholesale licenses except that if the financing corporation proposes to provide equity capital and thereby take a limited partnership interest in the applicant entity, the financing corporation shall not be required to comply with any Virginia residency requirement applicable to the issuance of wholesale licenses. In addition to the foregoing, the applicant entity shall certify to the Board and provide supporting documentation that the following requirements are met prior to issuance of the wholesale license: (i) the terms and conditions of any debt financing which the financing corporation proposes to provide are substantially the same as those available in the financial markets to other wholesale licensees who will be in competition with the applicant, (ii) the terms of any proposed equity financing transaction are such that future profits of the applicant’s business shall be distributed annually to the financing corporation in direct proportion to its percentage of ownership interest received in return for its investment of equity capital, (iii) if the financing corporation proposes to provide equity capital, it shall hold an ownership interest in the applicant entity through a limited partnership interest and no other arrangement and (iv) the applicant entity shall be contractually obligated to return such debt or equity capital to the financing corporation not later than the end of the eighth full year following the effective date of the transaction thereby terminating any ownership interest or right thereto of the financing corporation.Once the Board has issued a wholesale license pursuant to an application filed in accordance with this subdivision 3 b, any subsequent change in the partnership agreement or the financing documents shall be subject to the prior approval of the Board. In accordance with the previous paragraph, the Board may require the licensee to resubmit certifications and documentation.

If a financing corporation wishes to provide debt financing, including inventory financing, but not equity financing, to an existing wholesale licensee or a proposed new owner of an existing wholesale licensee, it may do so without regard to the provisions of subdivisions 3 a and 3 b of subsection B under the following circumstances and subject to the following conditions: (i) in order to secure such debt financing, a wholesale licensee or a proposed new owner thereof may grant a security interest in any of its assets, including inventory, other than the wholesale license itself or corporate stock of the wholesale licensee; in the event of default, the financing corporation may take title to any assets pledged to secure such debt but may not take title to the business of the wholesale licensee and may not manage or operate such business; (ii) debt capital may be supplied by such financing corporation to an existing wholesale licensee or a proposed new owner of an existing wholesale licensee so long as debt capital is provided on terms and conditions which are substantially the same as those available in the financial markets to other wholesale licensees in competition with the wholesale licensee which is being so financed; and (iii) the licensee or proposed new owner shall certify to the Board and provide supporting documentation that the requirements of (i) and (ii) of this subdivision 3 c have been met.Nothing in this section shall eliminate, affect or in any way modify the requirements of law pertaining to issuance and retention of a wholesale license as they may apply to existing wholesale licensees or new owners thereof which have received debt financing prior to the enactment of this subdivision 3 c.

Except for holders of retail licenses issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

, brewery licensees may sell beer to retail licensees for resale only under the following conditions: If such brewery or an affiliate or subsidiary thereof has taken title to the business of a wholesale licensee pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 3 a of subsection B, direct sale to retail licensees may be made during the 180-day period of operation allowed under that subdivision. Moreover, the holder of a brewery license may make sales of alcoholic beverages directly to retail licensees for a period not to exceed thirty days in the event that such retail licensees are normally serviced by a wholesale licensee representing that brewery which has been forced to suspend wholesale operations as a result of a natural disaster or other act of God or which has been terminated by the brewery for fraud, loss of license or assignment of assets for the benefit of creditors not in the ordinary course of business.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, including but not limited to those provisions whereby certain ownership or lease arrangements may be permissible, no manufacturer, bottler, importer, broker or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages shall make an agreement, or attempt to make an agreement, with a retail licensee pursuant to which any products sold by a competitor are excluded in whole or in part from the premises on which the retail licensee’s business is conducted.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a winery, brewery, or distillery licensee from paying a royalty to a historical preservation entity pursuant to a bona fide intellectual property agreement that (i) authorizes the winery, brewery, or distillery licensee to manufacture wine, beer, or spirits based on authentic historical recipes and identified with brand names owned and trademarked by the historical preservation entity; (ii) provides for royalties to be paid based solely on the volume of wine, beer, or spirits manufactured using such recipes and trademarks, rather than on the sales revenues generated from such wine, beer, or spirits; and (iii) has been approved by the Board.For purposes of this subdivision, “historical preservation entity” means an entity (a) that is exempt from income taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (b) whose declared purposes include the preservation, restoration, and protection of a historic community in the Commonwealth that is the site of at least 50 historically significant houses, shops, and public buildings dating to the eighteenth century; and (c) that owns not more than 12 retail establishments in the Commonwealth for which retail licenses have been issued by the Board.

Subject to such exceptions as may be provided by statute or Board regulations, no manufacturer, bottler, importer, broker or wholesaler of alcoholic beverages, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not, shall sell, rent, lend, buy for or give to any retail licensee, or to the owner of the premises in which the business of any retail licensee is conducted, any (i) money, equipment, furniture, fixtures, property, services or anything of value with which the business of such retail licensee is or may be conducted, or for any other purpose; (ii) advertising materials; and (iii) business entertainment, provided that no transaction permitted under this section or by Board regulation shall be used to require the retail licensee to partially or totally exclude from sale at its establishment alcoholic beverages of other manufacturers or wholesalers.The provisions of this subsection shall apply to manufacturers, bottlers, importers, brokers and wholesalers selling alcoholic beverages to any governmental instrumentality or employee thereof selling alcoholic beverages at retail within the exterior limits of the Commonwealth, including all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any commercial lifestyle center licensee.

History.

1989, c. 528, § 4-79.1; 1992, c. 349; 1993, c. 866; 2015, c. 421; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 421 added subdivision B 6.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and added the last paragraph of the section.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Lease of farm winery premises to cooperative wholesaler. —

A farm winery is not prohibited from leasing a portion of its premises to a cooperative wholesaler or from leasing equipment to a wholesaler for use in its business. Additionally, a farm winery is not prohibited from employing the same persons employed by the cooperative wholesaler. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert S. Bloxom, Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, 06-019,
(4/18/06).

“Brand name.” —

Title 4.1 does not define “brand name,” nor has the Board defined this term in its regulations. In the context of wine labels, Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority appears to be using the term “brand name” synonymously with the term “brand,” as that term is defined by the Virginia Code. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Richard L. Saslaw, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-061, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (11/15/19).

Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority guidance documents should not deem every change on a label to constitute a new brand in a manner that is contrary to the statutory definition of “brand” or that is contrary to regulations promulgated by the ABC Board. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Richard L. Saslaw, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-061, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (11/15/19).

§ 4.1-216.1.
Point-of-sale advertising materials authorized under certain conditions; civil penalties.

As used in this section:“Alcoholic beverage advertising material” or “advertising material” means any item, other than an illuminated device, which contains one or more references to a brand of alcoholic beverage and which is used to promote the sale of alcoholic beverages within the interior of a licensed retail establishment and which otherwise complies with Board regulations.“Authorized vendor” or “vendor” means any person, other than a wholesale wine or beer licensee, that a manufacturer has authorized to engage in a business consisting in whole or in part of the sale and distribution of any articles of tangible personal property bearing any of the manufacturer’s alcoholic beverage trademarks.“Manufacturer” means any brewery, winery, distillery, bottler, broker, importer and any person that a brewery, winery, or distiller has authorized to sell or arrange for the sale of its products to wholesale wine and beer licensees in Virginia or, in the case of spirits, to the Board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-215

or

4.1-216

and Board regulations adopted thereunder, a manufacturer or its authorized vendor and a wholesale wine and beer licensee may lend, buy for, or give to a retail licensee any alcoholic beverage advertising material made of paper, cardboard, canvas, rubber, foam, or plastic, provided the advertising materials have a wholesale value of $40 or less per item.

Alcoholic beverage advertising materials, other than those authorized by subsection B to be given to a retailer, may be displayed by a retail licensee in the interior of its licensed establishment provided:

The wholesale value of the advertising material does not exceed $250 per item, and

The advertising material is not obtained from a manufacturer, its authorized vendor, or any wholesale wine or beer licensee.A retail licensee shall retain for at least two years a record of its procurement of, including any payments for, such advertising materials along with an invoice or sales ticket containing a description of the item so purchased or otherwise procured.

Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a retail licensee shall not display in the interior of its licensed establishment any alcoholic beverage advertising materials, other than those that may be lawfully obtained and displayed in accordance with this section or Board regulation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any advertising materials permitted under Board regulations in effect on January 1, 2007.

History.

2007, c. 494.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 494, cl. 2 provides: “That the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall (i) include as part of its inspection of any retail licensee’s records a review of evidence of procurement, including payment, required by this act to be maintained by that retail licensee involving the procurement of alcoholic beverage advertising materials and (ii) report annually to the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services the following information: (a) the results of any audits of retail records involving the procurement, including purchases, of alcoholic beverage advertising materials authorized by this act and (b) the extent to which the Board has achieved compliance with the provisions of this act.”

§ 4.1-217.
Limitation on brewery licenses.

No beer reconstituted from beer concentrate, other than reconstituted beer originally manufactured, concentrated and reconstituted at the same plant located in the Commonwealth, shall be sold by any brewery licensee to persons licensed to sell beer at retail for purposes of resale.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 526, 528; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 200; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 707; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, cc. 190, 828, 866.

§ 4.1-218.
Limitation on wine and beer importers.

Wine importer licensees and beer importer licensees shall not sell and deliver or ship any brand of beer or wine to wholesale licensees for the purpose of resale until such importer has also complied with the provisions of this section and Board regulations for each such brand.

Any licensed importer, if not also the owner of the brand to be imported into the Commonwealth, shall provide to the Board written authorization from the brand owner entitling the importer to (i) sell and deliver or ship such brand into the Commonwealth and (ii) establish written agreements of a definite duration and within the meaning of the Wine Franchise Act (§

4.1-400

et seq.) and the Beer Franchise Act (§

4.1-500

et seq.), on behalf of the brand owner, as its authorized representative, with each wholesale licensee to whom the importer sells any brand of beer or wine owned by the brand owner. In addition, each such licensed importer shall file and maintain with the Board a current list of all wholesale licensees authorized by such importer, as the authorized representative of the brand owner, to distribute such brand within the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 526, 528; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 200; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 707; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, c. 866.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Distributor appointments made by prior authorized representative. —

The Wine Franchise Act or the Beer Franchise Act compels a winery or brewery to honor distributor appointments made by a prior authorized representative unless the winery or brewery provides a notice of intent to terminate the agreement and good cause exists for the nonrenewal or noncontinuation. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David B. Albo, Member, House of Delegates, 05-075, 2006 Va. AG LEXIS 18 (6/1/06).

An authorized representative cannot avoid application of the Wine Franchise Act or the Beer Franchise Act by requiring a waiver from the distributor because §§

4.1-416

and

4.1-515

prohibit such waivers. Additionally, the execution and filing of Attachments A and B and the exchange of purchase orders and invoices between authorized representatives and distributors do not constitute a “written agreement of definite duration” pursuant to this section. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David B. Albo, Member, House of Delegates, 05-075, 2006 Va. AG LEXIS 18 (6/1/06).

§ 4.1-219.
Limitation on Class A and Class B farm wineries.

For Class A farm winery licensees, at least 51 percent of the fruits or agricultural products used by the owner or lessee to manufacture the wine shall be grown or produced on such farm and no more than 25 percent of the fruits, fruit juices or other agricultural products shall be grown or produced outside the Commonwealth.

For Class B farm winery licensees, 75 percent of the fruits or agricultural products used by the owner or lessee to manufacture the wine shall be grown or produced in the Commonwealth and no more than 25 percent of the fruits, fruit juices or other agricultural products shall be grown or produced outside the Commonwealth. No Class B farm winery license shall be issued to any person who has not operated under an existing Virginia farm winery license for at least seven years.

Farm winery licensees may trade fruits or agricultural products grown or produced on such farms with other farm winery licensees. For the purposes of this section, fruit or agricultural products traded or exchanged between farm winery licensees shall be considered grown or produced on the receiving farm for the purposes of meeting the fruit sourcing requirement in subsections A and B, provided that verification is provided to the receiving farm that the fruit or agricultural products traded or exchanged were grown or produced in the Commonwealth by the farm winery licensee engaging in such trade or exchange. Both licensees shall maintain complete and accurate records of the quantity and source of any fruit or agricultural products traded or exchanged. Such trades or exchanges shall be bona fide transactions based on the fair market value of the fruits or agricultural products traded or exchanged. For the purposes of this subsection, “agricultural products” means the raw materials used or intended to be used in the manufacture of wine or cider by farm winery licensees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B, upon petition by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Board may permit the use (i) of a greater quantity of out-of-state products if supplies grown or produced in the Commonwealth are insufficient for a farm winery licensee, whether Class A or Class B, to achieve the level of production which otherwise could be anticipated during a given license year or (ii) by a Class A farm winery of a lesser percentage of products grown or produced on the farm if unusually severe weather or disease conditions cause a significant reduction in the availability of fruit or other agricultural products grown or produced on the farm to manufacture wine during a given license year. As used in this section, the terms “owner” and “lessee” shall include a cooperative formed by an association of individuals for the purpose of manufacturing wine. The term “farm” as used in this section includes all of the land owned or leased by the farm winery licensee as long as such land is located in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-2; 1952, c. 496; 1954, c. 682; 1962, c. 533; 1970, cc. 302, 309; 1974, cc. 460, 497; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 64, 702; 1977, c. 280; 1980, c. 324, § 4-25.1; 1981, c. 410; 1984, cc. 200, 559; 1985, cc. 448, 457; 1986, c. 190; 1990, cc. 300, 390, 707, 810, 932; 1991, c. 426; 1993, c. 866; 2000, cc. 1037, 1052; 2003, c. 631; 2008, c. 194; 2016, c. 656.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1037 and 1052 are identical, and added “For Class A farm winery licensees” at the beginning of the first paragraph; added the present second paragraph; and inserted “whether Class A or Class B” in the last paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 631 substituted “25” for “twenty-five,” “51” for “fifty-one,” and “75” for “seventy-five” in the first and second paragraphs, and in the final paragraph, inserted the clause (i) designation, and inserted “or (ii) by a Class A farm winery of a lesser percentage of products grown or produced on the farm if unusually severe weather or disease conditions cause a significant reduction in the availability of fruit or other agricultural products grown or produced on the farm to manufacture wine during a given license year.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 194 rewrote the last sentence of the last paragraph, which read: “In the event such cooperative is licensed as a farm winery, the term ‘farm’ as used in this section includes all of the land owned or leased by the individual members of the cooperative as long as such land is located in the Commonwealth.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 656 added the subsection A, B and D designations, added subsection C, and substituted “Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B” for “However” at the beginning of subsection D.

Law Review.

For article, “Wine Tasting Activities in Virginia: Is America’s First Wine Producing State Destined to Wither on the Vine Due to Overregulation?,” see 23 T.M. Cooley L. Rev. 221 (2006).

§ 4.1-220.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2022.

History.

Former §

4.1-220

, relating to limitation on gift shop licenses., was derived from Code 1950, § 4-25; 1952, c. 535; 1956, c. 520; 1962, c. 532; 1964, c. 210; 1970, cc. 627, 723; 1972, c. 679; 1973, c. 343; 1974, c. 267; 1975, c. 408; 1976, cc. 134, 447, 496, 703; 1977, c. 439; 1978, c. 190; 1979, c. 258; 1980, cc. 526, 528; 1981, cc. 410, 412; 1982, c. 66; 1984, c. 200; 1987, c. 365; 1988, c. 893; 1989, c. 42; 1990, c. 707; 1991, c. 628; 1992, cc. 215, 350; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to retail off-premises wine and beer license for gift shop, see
§

4.1-206.3

.

§ 4.1-221.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Limitation on mixed beverage licensees; exceptions.

Unless excepted by subsection B, all alcoholic beverages sold as mixed beverages shall be purchased from the Board.

Mixed beverage carrier licensees may obtain from other lawful sources alcoholic beverages to be sold as mixed beverages on trains, boats or airplanes of the licensees provided there is paid to the Board in lieu of the taxes otherwise directly imposed under this chapter and any markup otherwise charged by the Board, a tax of ten cents for each of the average number of drinks of mixed beverages determined by the Board as having been consumed within the geographical confines of the Commonwealth on such trains, boats or airplanes. Such tax shall be calculated on the basis of the proportionate number of revenue passenger miles traveled within the Commonwealth by such a licensee in relation to the total quantity of all alcoholic beverages obtained either inside or outside the Commonwealth by the licensee for consumption on trains, boats or airplanes of the licensee. Such tax shall be paid to the Board on a quarterly basis.

The entire contents of a closed container of distilled spirits shall not be served to an individual for on-premises consumption or for off-premises consumption pursuant to §

4.1-212.1

except as may be provided by Board regulation.

History.

1968, c. 7, § 4-98.11; 1972, c. 17; 1974, c. 460; 1984, c. 318; 1986, c. 374; 1993, c. 866; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282; .

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall convene a work group to study the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption. In conducting the study, the work group shall analyze the implementation of the provisions of this act that authorize the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption, determine whether such provisions should be implemented permanently, and identify any further statutory or regulatory modifications that should be made in the event that such provisions are made permanent. The Authority shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted “or for off-premises consumption pursuant to §

4.1-212.1

” in subsection C. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

§ 4.1-221.
(Effective July 1, 2024) Limitation on mixed beverage licensees; exceptions.

Unless excepted by subsection B, all alcoholic beverages sold as mixed beverages shall be purchased from the Board.

Mixed beverage carrier licensees may obtain from other lawful sources alcoholic beverages to be sold as mixed beverages on trains, boats or airplanes of the licensees provided there is paid to the Board in lieu of the taxes otherwise directly imposed under this chapter and any markup otherwise charged by the Board, a tax of ten cents for each of the average number of drinks of mixed beverages determined by the Board as having been consumed within the geographical confines of the Commonwealth on such trains, boats or airplanes. Such tax shall be calculated on the basis of the proportionate number of revenue passenger miles traveled within the Commonwealth by such a licensee in relation to the total quantity of all alcoholic beverages obtained either inside or outside the Commonwealth by the licensee for consumption on trains, boats or airplanes of the licensee. Such tax shall be paid to the Board on a quarterly basis.

The entire contents of a closed container of distilled spirits shall not be served to an individual for on-premises consumption except as may be provided by Board regulation.

History.

1968, c. 7, § 4-98.11; 1972, c. 17; 1974, c. 460; 1984, c. 318; 1986, c. 374; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-221.1.
Limitation of tasting licenses.

Single samples of alcoholic beverages given or sold by a licensee shall not exceed four ounces of beer, two ounces of wine, or one-half ounce of spirits, unless served as a mixed beverage, in which case a single sample of spirits may contain up to one and one-half ounces of spirits; and no more than 12 ounces of beer, five ounces of wine, or three ounces of spirits shall be offered to any person per day. Tasting licenses for mixed beverages shall be issued only for events to be held in localities that do not prohibit the sale of mixed beverages pursuant to §

4.1-124

. No license shall be issued to any person to whom issuance of a retail license is prohibited. No more than 12 tasting licenses annually shall be issued to any person. The provisions of this section shall not apply to tastings conducted pursuant to §

4.1-201.1

.

History.

1996, cc. 584, 596; 2006, c. 826; 2019, cc. 37, 178; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114, 1177.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, cc. 37 and
178, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and third enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 826 added the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 37 and 178 are identical, effective July 1, 2020, and substituted “that do not prohibit” for “which have approved” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1177 substituted “12” for “four” in the penultimate sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and rewrote the first sentence, which read, “Samples of alcoholic beverages given or sold by a licensee shall not exceed two ounces per person of each product tasted, provided that (i) in the case of wine or beer, no more than four products shall be offered or (ii) in the case of spirits, no more than two products shall be offered”; and in the second sentence, substituted “shall be issued only for events“ for “shall only be issued for events.”